Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.060

Garbage ordinance—Lien—Foreclosure.

A garbage ordinance of a code city may contain the provisions authorized by RCW 35.21.130. Notice shall be given of a lien for garbage collection and disposal service, the lien shall have priority and be foreclosed all as provided in RCW 35.21.140 and 35.21.150.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.060.]